Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.920

Provisions exclusive—Authority of political subdivisions to levy business and occupation taxes not affected.

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing and regulation of collection agencies and out-of-state collection agencies shall be exclusive and no county, city, or other political subdivision of this state shall enact any laws or rules and regulations licensing or regulating collection agencies.

(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent a political subdivision of this state from levying a business and occupation tax upon collection agencies or out-of-state collection agencies maintaining an office within that political subdivision if a business and occupation tax is levied by it upon other types of businesses within its boundaries.

[ 1994 c 195 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 42.]